inc/flattened/createYaml/yaml_output/VAI_IND_i.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: niniim
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg: giniim
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl: niniimimin
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl: giniimimin
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl: giniimim
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx: niimi
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx: niimiwag
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv: niimiwan
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlObv: [niimiwan,niimiwa']
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+X: niimim
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg: [niniimisiin,niniimisii]
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg: [giniimisiin,giniimisii]
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl: niniimisiimin
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl: giniimisiimin
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl: giniimisiim
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx: [niimisiin,niimisii]
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx: niimisiiwag
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv: niimisiiwan
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlObv: [niimisiiwan,niimisiiwa']
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+X: niimisiim
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg: niniiminaaban
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg: giniiminaaban
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl: niniimiminaaban
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl: giniimiminaaban
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl: giniimimwaaban
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx: niimiiban
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx: [niimiibaniig,niimiibaneg]
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv: [niimiibaniin,niimiibanen]
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlObv: [niimiibaniin,niimiibanen]
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+X: niimimwaaban
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg: niniimisiinaaban
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg: giniimisiinaaban
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl: niniimisiiminaaban
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl: giniimisiiminaaban
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl: giniimisiimwaaban
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx: niimisiiban
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx: [niimisiibaniig,niimisiibaneg]
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv: [niimisiibaniin,niimisiibanen]
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlObv: [niimisiibaniin,niimisiibanen]
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+X: niimisiimwaaban
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg: niniiminaadog
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg: giniiminaadog
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl: niniimiminaadog
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl: giniimiminaadog
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl: giniimimwaadog
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx: [niimiwidog,niimidog]
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx: [niimiwidogenag,niimidogenag]
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv: [niimiwidogenan,niimidogenan]
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlObv: [niimiwidogenan,niimidogenan]
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+X: niimimwaadog
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg: niniimisiinaadog
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg: giniimisiinaadog
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl: niniimisiiminaadog
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl: giniimisiiminaadog
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl: giniimisiimwaadog
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx: niimisiidog
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx: niimisiidogenag
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv: niimisiidogenan
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlObv: [niimisiidogenan,niimisiidogena']
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+X: niimisiimwaadog
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgProx: niimigoban
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3PlProx: niimigwaaan
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgObv: niiminigoban
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgProx: niimisiigoban
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3PlProx: niimisiigwaaban
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgObv: niimiisiinigoban
